Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-373
Annulments; procedure.

Actions for annulment of a marriage shall be brought in the same manner as actions for dissolution of marriage and shall be subject to all applicable provisions of sections 42-347 to 42-381 pertaining to dissolution of marriage, except that the only residence requirement shall be that the plaintiff is an actual resident of the county in which the complaint is filed.

Laws 1972, LB 820, § 27;

Laws 1997, LB 229, § 20;

Laws 2004, LB 1207, § 30.